lt-LT: Komutavimo sluoksnis: 2 sluoksnis; 2 sluoksnis Lite; 2+ sluoksnis; 2/3 sluoksnis; 3 sluoksnis; 3 sluoksnis Lite; 4 sluoksnis; Kita
de: Switching-Schicht: Layer 2; Layer 2 Lite; Layer 2+; Layer 2/3; Layer 3; Layer 3 Lite; Layer 4; Sonstiges
es: Capa de conmutación: Capa 2; Capa 2 Lite; Capa 2+; Capa 2/3; Capa 3; Capa 3 Lite; Capa 4; Otros
fi: Kytkentätaso: Taso 2; Taso 2 Lite; Taso 2+; Taso 2/3; Taso 3; Taso 3 Lite; Taso 4; Muu
hr-HR: Sloj preklapanja: Sloj 2; Sloj 2 Lite; Sloj 2+; Sloj 2/3; Sloj 3; Sloj 3 Lite; Sloj 4; Ostalo
th: ชั้นสวิตชิ่ง: เลเยอร์ 2; เลเยอร์ 2 ไลท์; เลเยอร์ 2+; เลเยอร์ 2/3; เลเยอร์ 3; เลเยอร์ 3 ไลท์; เลเยอร์ 4; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Spínacia vrstva: Vrstva 2; Vrstva 2 Lite; Vrstva 2+; Vrstva 2/3; Vrstva 3; Vrstva 3 Lite; Vrstva 4; Iné
zh-CN: 交换层: 第 2 层; 第 2 层精简版; 第 2+ 层; 第 2/3 层; 第 3 层; 第 3 层精简版; 第 4 层; 其他
it: Livello di switching: Layer 2; Layer 2 Lite; Layer 2+; Layer 2/3; Layer 3; Layer 3 Lite; Layer 4; Altro
tr: Anahtarlama katmanı: Katman 2; Katman 2 Lite; Katman 2+; Katman 2/3; Katman 3; Katman 3 Lite; Katman 4; Diğer
ko: 스위칭 레이어: 레이어 2; 레이어 2 라이트; 레이어 2+; 레이어 2/3; 레이어 3; 레이어 3 라이트; 레이어 4; 기타
sl-SI: Stikalna plast: Sloj 2; Sloj 2 lite; Sloj 2+; Sloj 2/3; Sloj 3; Sloj 3 lite; Sloj 4; Drugo
ro-RO: Nivelul de comutare: Nivel 2; Nivel 2 Lite; Nivel 2+; Nivel 2/3; Nivel 3; Nivel 3 Lite; Nivel 4; Altele
ja: スイッチングレイヤー: レイヤー2; レイヤー2ライト; レイヤー2+; レイヤー2/3; レイヤー3; レイヤー3ライト; レイヤー4; その他
pt-BR: Camada de comutação: Camada 2; Camada 2 Lite; Camada 2+; Camada 2/3; Camada 3; Camada 3 Lite; Camada 4; Outro
bg-BG: Слой на комутация: Слой 2; Слой 2 лайт; Слой 2+; Слой 2/3; Слой 3; Слой 3 лайт; Слой 4; Други
zh-TW: 交換層: 第 2 層; 第 2 層精簡版; 第 2+ 層; 第 2/3 層; 第 3 層; 第 3 層精簡版; 第 4 層; 其他
en: Switching layer: Layer 2; Layer 2 Lite; Layer 2+; Layer 2/3; Layer 3; Layer 3 Lite; Layer 4; Other
pt-PT: Camada de comutação: Camada 2; Camada 2 Lite; Camada 2+; Camada 2/3; Camada 3; Camada 3 Lite; Camada 4; Outro
nl: Switching-laag: Laag 2; Laag 2 Lite; Laag 2+; Laag 2/3; Laag 3; Laag 3 Lite; Laag 4; Andere
nb: Svitsjingslag: Lag 2; Lag 2 Lite; Lag 2+; Lag 2/3; Lag 3; Lag 3 Lite; Lag 4; Annet
cs: Přepínací vrstva: Vrstva 2; Vrstva 2 Lite; Vrstva 2+; Vrstva 2/3; Vrstva 3; Vrstva 3 Lite; Vrstva 4; Jiné
fr: Couche de commutation: Couche 2; Couche 2 Lite; Couche 2+; Couche 2/3; Couche 3; Couche 3 Lite; Couche 4; Autre
ru: Уровень коммутации: Уровень 2; Уровень 2 Lite; Уровень 2+; Уровень 2/3; Уровень 3; Уровень 3 Lite; Уровень 4; Другой
vi: Lớp chuyển mạch: Lớp 2; Lớp 2 Lite; Lớp 2+; Lớp 2/3; Lớp 3; Lớp 3 Lite; Lớp 4; Khác
sv: Switchlager: Lager 2; Lager 2 Lite; Lager 2+; Lager 2/3; Lager 3; Lager 3 Lite; Lager 4; Övrigt
da: Switchlag: Lag 2; Lag 2 Lite; Lag 2+; Lag 2/3; Lag 3; Lag 3 Lite; Lag 4; Andet
pl: Warstwa przełączania: Warstwa 2; Warstwa 2 Lite; Warstwa 2+; Warstwa 2/3; Warstwa 3; Warstwa 3 Lite; Warstwa 4; Inne
el: Επίπεδο μεταγωγής: Επίπεδο 2; Επίπεδο 2 Lite; Επίπεδο 2+; Επίπεδο 2/3; Επίπεδο 3; Επίπεδο 3 Lite; Επίπεδο 4; Άλλο
hu: Kapcsolási réteg: 2. réteg; 2. réteg Lite; 2+ réteg; 2/3. réteg; 3. réteg; 3. réteg Lite; 4. réteg; Egyéb